District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.33

Repealed

Voting of shares — Number; election.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 193, ch. 269, § 33
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(m), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-916a.
1981 Ed., § 29-333.
2001 Ed., § 29-101.33.